Utah statutes.
62A-15-503.   Assessments for DUI -- Use of money for rehabilitation
programs, including victim impact panels -- Rulemaking power granted.
(1)  Assessments imposed under Section 62A-15-502 may, pursuant to court
order, either:
(a)  be collected by the clerk of the court in which the person was convicted;
or
(b)  be paid directly to the licensed alcohol or drug treatment program.
Those assessments collected by the court shall either be:
(i)  forwarded to the state treasurer for credit to the Intoxicated Driver
Rehabilitation Account created by Section 62A-15-502.5; or
(ii)  forwarded to a special nonlapsing account created by the county
treasurer of the county in which the fee is collected.
(2)  Proceeds of the accounts described in Subsection (1) shall be used
exclusively for the operation of licensed alcohol or drug rehabilitation
programs and education, assessment, supervision, and other activities related
to and supporting the rehabilitation of persons convicted of driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs.  A requirement of the
rehabilitation program shall be participation with a victim impact panel or
program providing a forum for victims of alcohol or drug related offenses and
defendants to share experiences on the impact of alcohol or drug related
incidents in their lives.  The Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health
shall establish guidelines to implement victim impact panels where, in the
judgment of the licensed alcohol or drug program, appropriate victims are
available, and shall establish guidelines for other programs where such
victims are not available.
(3)  None of the assessments shall be maintained for administrative costs by
the division.
